Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 343.326 is amended to read:
343.326. (1) When a student  with a disability is placed on an abbreviated school day program,
the provisions of this section apply.
(2) For each student with a  disability placed on an abbreviated school day program, the school
district shall:
(a) Prior to each meeting of the student’s individualized  education program team, provide the
following information in writing to the  parent or foster parent of the student in a language and
format accessible to the parent or foster parent:
(A) The school district’s duty to comply with the requirements of ORS 343.321 to 343.331;
(B) The  prohibition against a school district unilaterally placing a student with a disability on
an abbreviated school day program;
(C) The student’s right to have meaningful access to the same number of hours of  instruction
and educational services as the majority of other students who  are in the same grade within the
student’s resident school district; and
(D) The parent’s or foster parent’s right, at any time, to withdraw  consent for an abbreviated
school day program placement or to request a meeting  of the student’s individualized education
program team to discuss whether the student should no longer be placed  on an abbreviated school
day program.
(b) Hold a meeting of the student’s individualized education program team to  review the
student’s abbreviated school day program as described in paragraph (c) of this subsection.  During
the school year, a meeting must be held:
(A) No fewer than 25  calendar days and no more than 35 calendar days after the initial place-
ment on the abbreviated school day program.
(B) No  less frequently than once every 30 calendar days, starting after the meeting described
in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, unless the parent or foster parent provides written consent
to meet less frequently than once every 30 calendar days. Notwithstanding written consent provided
under this subparagraph:
(i) In no event may a meeting be held less frequently than:
(I) Once every 90 calendar days for a student  with an individualized education program, starting
after the meeting described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph;
Enrolled Senate Bill 745 (SB 745-INTRO) Page 1
(II) Once every year for  a student with a 504 Plan, starting after the meeting described in sub-
paragraph (A) of this paragraph;
(III) Once every year for a student who is enrolled in  a virtual public charter school that op-
erates in compliance with ORS  chapter 338 and who has meaningful access to the same number of
hours of instruction and educational services as the majority of other students who are not disabled
students and who are  in the same grade within the school, starting after the meeting described in
subparagraph (A) of this paragraph; [ or]
(IV) Once every year for a student receiving educational  services in a pediatric nursing facility
as provided in ORS 343.941, starting after the meeting described  in subparagraph (A) of this para-
graph; [ and] or
(V) Once every year for a student who has an illness or sickness that can reasonably be
expected to result in death in 12  months or less, starting after the meeting described in
subparagraph (A) of this paragraph; and
(ii) A meeting must be held within  14 calendar days of a parent or foster parent requesting a
meeting.
(c) During each meeting of the student’s individualized education  program team while the stu-
dent is placed on the abbreviated school day program:
(A) Obtain from the parent  or foster parent a signed acknowledgement that the parent or foster
parent received the information described in paragraph (a) of this subsection;
(B) Review the student’s progress on the abbreviated school day program;
(C) Consider at least one reasonable alternative placement  that includes appropriate supports
for the student and that could  enable the student to have meaningful access to the same number
of hours of instruction and educational services that are provided to the majority of other students
who are in the same grade within the student’s resident school district; and
(D) If the  individualized education program team recommends continuing the abbreviated school
day placement, consider whether the number of hours of instruction and educational  services should
be increased.
(d) If the parent or foster parent provides informed and  written consent to continue an abbre-
viated school  day program placement, include in the student’s individualized education program or
504 Plan a written statement that:
(A) Explains the reasons the student was placed on the abbreviated school day program; and
(B) Describes in detail other reasonable options that were considered  and documents why each
option considered was not implemented.
(e) At least once every 30 calendar days during the school year, inform  the Department of Ed-
ucation about the student’s abbreviated school day program placement, including:
(A) The grade level of the student;
(B) The number of hours of instruction  and educational services the school district is scheduled
to provide to the student each week;
(C) The date the student began the abbreviated school day program; and
(D) The  date by which the student is expected to receive meaningful access to the same number
of hours of instruction and educational services that are provided to the majority of other students
who are in the same grade within the student’s resident school district.
(3)(a) The school district superintendent must review a student’s abbreviated school day program
placement if the student is placed on an abbreviated school day program for:
(A) Ninety or more cumulative calendar days during a school year; or
(B) Ninety or more cumulative calendar days, excluding summer break,  when the student is
placed on an abbreviated school day program during two or more consecutive school years.
(b) The school district superintendent must review the  student’s abbreviated school day program
placement when required under paragraph (a) of this subsection and:
(A) Find that the  abbreviated school day program placement is compliant with state and federal
law and document in writing:
Enrolled Senate Bill 745 (SB 745-INTRO) Page 2
(i) The efforts of the school district to facilitate the student’s meaningful access to  the same
number of hours  of instruction and educational services that are provided to the majority of other
students who are in the same grade within the student’s resident school district; and
(ii) The specific barriers that prevent that meaningful access; or
(B) Find that  the abbreviated school day program placement is not compliant with state and
federal law  and ensure that, within five school days of making the finding, the student has mean-
ingful access to the same number of  hours of instruction and educational services that are provided
to the majority of other students who are in  the same grade within the student’s resident school
district unless an extension has been allowed as provided by ORS 343.328 (1)(d).
(c) In addition to a finding made under paragraph (b) of this  subsection, for any student in
grades 9 through 12 not expected to graduate  on time with a high school diploma, a modified di-
ploma or an extended diploma, the school district superintendent must document in writing:
(A) The plan for credit recovery and comprehensive services, including compensatory  services,
that is being implemented to  ensure the student’s on-time graduation with a high school diploma, a
modified diploma or an extended diploma; and
(B) The student’s progress toward on-time graduation with a high school diploma,  a modified
diploma or an extended diploma.
(d) If the student is served by an education program through an  education service district, the
requirements of paragraphs (a) to  (c) of this subsection apply to the superintendent of the resident
school  district.
(e) Any findings or documentation  required under paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection must
be provided, within five school days of making the finding, to the  student’s parent or foster parent
in a language and format accessible to the parent or foster parent.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate April 10, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 8, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 745 (SB 745-INTRO) Page 3